Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202181-12,220
Act; purpose.

The purpose of the Shovel-Ready Capital Recovery and Investment Act is to partner with the private sector by providing grants to qualified nonprofit organizations to assist such organizations with capital projects that have been delayed due to COVID-19 and that will provide a positive economic impact in the State of Nebraska.

Laws 2021, LB566, § 2.